Massachusetts, session 194th, H1272.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Chapter 167 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 14A and inserting in place thereof the 
following section:-  
Section 14A. There shall be established within the Division of Banks 2 regional mortgage 
review boards in the commonwealth. There shall be a Boston metropolitan area mortgage review 
board which shall include the counties of Suffolk, Essex, Middlesex, Norfolk, Bristol, Plymouth, 
Barnstable, Dukes, and Nantucket; and a central and western Massachusetts mortgage review 
board which shall include the counties of Worcester, Franklin, Hampden, Hampshire and 
Berkshire. Each such board shall consist of 5 members appointed by the commissioner for a term 

of 5 10 of 3 years, 2 of whom shall be mortgagees and 3 of whom shall be community representatives; 
provided, however, that all members of each such board shall live or work within the respective 
region. The commissioner shall provide minority and demographic representation in the 
membership of each board.   
Upon the expiration of the term of any member of a regional board, a successor shall be 
appointed, in like manner, for a term of 3 years. In the event of a vacancy, the commissioner 
may, in like manner, appoint a member who shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. 
Members of each such board shall serve without compensation, and shall be sworn to the faithful 
performance of their duties. Each regional board shall suggest for consideration by the 
commissioner 1 or more names for each such expiring term or vacancy.   
The mortgage review boards shall meet on a regular basis to review each residential 
mortgage loan denial that an applicant believes was denied on the basis of the location of the 
property. Any applicant whose residential mortgage loan application is denied by any mortgagee 
making 5 or more residential mortgage loans in any calendar year shall be instructed by the 
mortgagee, in writing, at the time of denial of his or her right to appeal any such denial to the 
appropriate mortgage review board.  
For the purposes of this section, a “residential mortgage loan denial” shall mean the 
denial of a loan on real property located within the respective regions of the Boston metropolitan 
area mortgage review board or the central and western Massachusetts mortgage review board 
having thereon a dwelling house with accommodations for 4 or less separate households and 
occupied, or to be occupied, in whole or in part by the obligor on the mortgage debt; provided, 
however, that residential property shall be limited to the primary residence of a person; provided 

of 5 32 further, that residential property shall not include an investment property or residence other than 
a primary residence; and provided further, that residential property shall not include residential 
property taken in whole or in part as collateral for a commercial loan.   
Said board shall review each such submitted mortgage application, make its 
determination and advise the applicant thereof, in writing, within 45 days of such appeal of a 
mortgage loan application denial and if such board fails to complete said action within said 45 
days, the applicant will be considered to have exhausted his or her administrative remedies. The 
decision of the board shall be subject to review in the manner provided in chapter 30A, or in 
accordance with the provisions of section 64 of chapter 183.   
The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations governing the establishment, 
operation and procedures of said mortgage review boards.   
SECTION 2.   Chapter 167 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out section 14C and inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
Section 14C. There shall be established within the Division of Banks a small business 
loan review board in the commonwealth.  The board shall consist of 5 members appointed by the 
commissioner for a term of 3 years, 2 of whom shall be representatives of banks or bank holding 
companies and 3 of whom shall be small business or community representatives.  In making such 
appointments, the commissioner may take into consideration geographic diversity within the 
commonwealth.   
Upon the expiration of the term of any member of the board, a successor shall be 
appointed, in like manner, for a term of 3 years. In the event of a vacancy, the commissioner 
may, in like manner, appoint a member who shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. 

of 5 54 Members of the board shall be sworn to the faithful performance of their duties. The board shall 
suggest for consideration by the commissioner 1 or more names for each such expiring term or 
vacancy.    
The small business loan review board shall meet on a regular basis or, as demand for its 
services requires, to review small business loan denials that applicants believe were 
unreasonably denied.  The small business loan review board shall be required to report the results 
of its findings to the applicant within 30 days of submission of request for review; provided, 
however, that the board may, at its discretion, extend the review period to within 60 days of a 
submission or request. Upon making a determination for reason of denial, the small business loan 
review board shall be required to provide information on its findings to the applicant and 
commissioner and shall provide information to the applicant on alternative sources of financing, 
including information on any small business financing programs or other relevant programs 
offered by the commonwealth. The commissioner shall file a report regarding the activities of the 
small business loan review board for each calendar year with the chairs of the joint committee on 
community development and small business, chairs of the joint committee on economic 
development and emerging technologies, and chairs of the joint committee on financial services.  
Such report shall be filed within 60 days of the end of each calendar year.  
In addition, the small business loan review board may conduct annual studies or issue an 
annual report on the availability of credit to small businesses within all regions of the 
commonwealth and report back to the commissioner on its findings. The report may be made 
available to the public through the website of the office of consumer affairs and business 
regulation or the small business website established under section 3 of chapter 23A.    The 

of 5 76 commissioner shall also promote the small business review board as a resource for small 
businesses on the small business website established under section 3 of chapter 23A.  
For the purposes of this section, a “small business loan” shall mean a loan by a bank, 
federal bank or federally chartered credit union to a business organization or entity which either 
had gross annual revenues of $1 million or less in its preceding calendar year or which meets the 
size standards and revenue requirements of the Small Business Administration for each industry 
sector pursuant to 13 CFR 121.201.     
The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations governing the establishment, 
operation and procedures of said small business loan review board.